Illinois, session 104th, HB5202.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Senior Citizens and Persons with 5Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act is amended by changing 6Section 4 as follows: 7    (320 ILCS 25/4)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 404)8    Sec. 4. Amount of Grant. 9    (a) In general. Any individual 65 years or older or any 10individual who will become 65 years old during the calendar 11year in which a claim is filed, and any surviving spouse of 12such a claimant, who at the time of death received or was 13entitled to receive a grant pursuant to this Section, which 14surviving spouse will become 65 years of age within the 24 15months immediately following the death of such claimant and 16which surviving spouse but for his or her age is otherwise 17qualified to receive a grant pursuant to this Section, and any 18person with a disability whose annual household income is less 19than the income eligibility limitation, as defined in 20subsection (a-5) and whose household is liable for payment of 21property taxes accrued or has paid rent constituting property 22taxes accrued and is domiciled in this State at the time he or 23she files his or her claim is entitled to claim a grant under   HB5202- 2 -LRB104 18288 KTG 31728 b1this Act. With respect to claims filed by individuals who will 2become 65 years old during the calendar year in which a claim 3is filed, the amount of any grant to which that household is 4entitled shall be an amount equal to 1/12 of the amount to 5which the claimant would otherwise be entitled as provided in 6this Section, multiplied by the number of months in which the 7claimant was 65 in the calendar year in which the claim is 8filed.9    (a-5) Income eligibility limitation. 10        (1) For purposes of determining an applicant's 11    eligibility for free transit services administered by a 12    municipality or public transit authority under Sections 51 13    and 52 of the Chicago Transit Authority Act, Sections 8.6 14    and 8.7 of the Local Mass Transit District Act, and 15    Section 2.04 of the Northern Illinois Transit Authority 16    Act, this Section, "income eligibility limitation" means 17    an amount for grant years 2008 through 2019:18        (1) less than $22,218 for a household containing one 19    person;20        (2) less than $29,480 for a household containing 2 21    persons; or22        (3) less than $36,740 for a household containing 3 or 23    more persons.24    For grant years 2020 and thereafter:25            (A) (1) less than $33,562 for a household 26        containing one person;  HB5202- 3 -LRB104 18288 KTG 31728 b1            (B) (2) less than $44,533 for a household 2        containing 2 persons; or3            (C) (3) less than $55,500 for a household 4        containing 3 or more persons. 5        (2) For purposes of determining an applicant's 6    eligibility for reduced vehicle registration fees provided 7    under Section 3-806.3 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, 8    "income eligibility limitation" means an amount: 9            (A) less than $33,562 for a household containing 10        one person;11            (B) less than $44,533 for a household containing 2 12        persons; or 13            (C) less than $55,500 for a household containing 3 14        or more persons. 15    The income eligibility limitation amounts listed in 16paragraph (2) shall be adjusted every 3 years by an amount 17equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the consumer 18price index-u during the preceding 12-month calendar year. As 19used in this subsection, "consumer price index-u" means the 20index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the 21United States Department of Labor that measures the average 22change in prices of goods and services purchased by all urban 23consumers, United States city average, all items, 1982-84 = 24100. The new amount resulting from each adjustment shall be 25determined by the Comptroller and provided by the Comptroller 26to the Department on Aging. The Department on Aging shall   HB5202- 4 -LRB104 18288 KTG 31728 b1determine the dates upon which the new adjusted amounts take 2effect and shall publish the adjusted amounts. 3    For 2009 claim year applications submitted during calendar 4year 2010, a household must have annual household income of 5less than $27,610 for a household containing one person; less 6than $36,635 for a household containing 2 persons; or less 7than $45,657 for a household containing 3 or more persons.8    The Department on Aging may adopt rules such that on 9January 1, 2011, and thereafter, the foregoing household 10income eligibility limits may be changed to reflect the annual 11cost of living adjustment in Social Security and Supplemental 12Security Income benefits that are applicable to the year for 13which those benefits are being reported as income on an 14application.15    If a person files as a surviving spouse, then only his or 16her income shall be counted in determining his or her 17household income. 18    (b) Limitation. Except as otherwise provided in 19subsections (a) and (f) of this Section, the maximum amount of 20grant which a claimant is entitled to claim is the amount by 21which the property taxes accrued which were paid or payable 22during the last preceding tax year or rent constituting 23property taxes accrued upon the claimant's residence for the 24last preceding taxable year exceeds 3 1/2% of the claimant's 25household income for that year but in no event is the grant to 26exceed (i) $700 less 4.5% of household income for that year for   HB5202- 5 -LRB104 18288 KTG 31728 b1those with a household income of $14,000 or less or (ii) $70 if 2household income for that year is more than $14,000.3    (c) Public aid recipients. If household income in one or 4more months during a year includes cash assistance in excess 5of $55 per month from the Department of Healthcare and Family 6Services or the Department of Human Services (acting as 7successor to the Department of Public Aid under the Department 8of Human Services Act) which was determined under regulations 9of that Department on a measure of need that included an 10allowance for actual rent or property taxes paid by the 11recipient of that assistance, the amount of grant to which 12that household is entitled, except as otherwise provided in 13subsection (a), shall be the product of (1) the maximum amount 14computed as specified in subsection (b) of this Section and 15(2) the ratio of the number of months in which household income 16did not include such cash assistance over $55 to the number 17twelve. If household income did not include such cash 18assistance over $55 for any months during the year, the amount 19of the grant to which the household is entitled shall be the 20maximum amount computed as specified in subsection (b) of this 21Section. For purposes of this paragraph (c), "cash assistance" 22does not include any amount received under the federal 23Supplemental Security Income (SSI) program.24    (d) Joint ownership. If title to the residence is held 25jointly by the claimant with a person who is not a member of 26his or her household, the amount of property taxes accrued   HB5202- 6 -LRB104 18288 KTG 31728 b1used in computing the amount of grant to which he or she is 2entitled shall be the same percentage of property taxes 3accrued as is the percentage of ownership held by the claimant 4in the residence.5    (e) More than one residence. If a claimant has occupied 6more than one residence in the taxable year, he or she may 7claim only one residence for any part of a month. In the case 8of property taxes accrued, he or she shall prorate 1/12 of the 9total property taxes accrued on his or her residence to each 10month that he or she owned and occupied that residence; and, in 11the case of rent constituting property taxes accrued, shall 12prorate each month's rent payments to the residence actually 13occupied during that month.14    (f) (Blank).15    (g) Effective January 1, 2006, there is hereby established 16a program of pharmaceutical assistance to the aged and to 17persons with disabilities, entitled the Illinois Seniors and 18Disabled Drug Coverage Program, which shall be administered by 19the Department of Healthcare and Family Services and the 20Department on Aging in accordance with this subsection, to 21consist of coverage of specified prescription drugs on behalf 22of beneficiaries of the program as set forth in this 23subsection. Notwithstanding any provisions of this Act to the 24contrary, on and after July 1, 2012, pharmaceutical assistance 25under this Act shall no longer be provided, and on July 1, 2012 26the Illinois Senior Citizens and Disabled Persons   HB5202- 7 -LRB104 18288 KTG 31728 b1Pharmaceutical Assistance Program shall terminate. The 2following provisions that concern the Illinois Senior Citizens 3and Disabled Persons Pharmaceutical Assistance Program shall 4continue to apply on and after July 1, 2012 to the extent 5necessary to pursue any actions authorized by subsection (d) 6of Section 9 of this Act with respect to acts which took place 7prior to July 1, 2012.8    To become a beneficiary under the program established 9under this subsection, a person must:10        (1) be (i) 65 years of age or older or (ii) a person 11    with a disability; and12        (2) be domiciled in this State; and13        (3) enroll with a qualified Medicare Part D 14    Prescription Drug Plan if eligible and apply for all 15    available subsidies under Medicare Part D; and16        (4) for the 2006 and 2007 claim years, have a maximum 17    household income of (i) less than $21,218 for a household 18    containing one person, (ii) less than $28,480 for a 19    household containing 2 persons, or (iii) less than $35,740 20    for a household containing 3 or more persons; and21        (5) for the 2008 claim year, have a maximum household 22    income of (i) less than $22,218 for a household containing 23    one person, (ii) $29,480 for a household containing 2 24    persons, or (iii) $36,740 for a household containing 3 or 25    more persons; and26        (6) for 2009 claim year applications submitted during   HB5202- 8 -LRB104 18288 KTG 31728 b1    calendar year 2010, have annual household income of less 2    than (i) $27,610 for a household containing one person; 3    (ii) less than $36,635 for a household containing 2 4    persons; or (iii) less than $45,657 for a household 5    containing 3 or more persons; and6        (7) as of September 1, 2011, have a maximum household 7    income at or below 200% of the federal poverty level. 8    All individuals enrolled as of December 31, 2005, in the 9pharmaceutical assistance program operated pursuant to 10subsection (f) of this Section and all individuals enrolled as 11of December 31, 2005, in the SeniorCare Medicaid waiver 12program operated pursuant to Section 5-5.12a of the Illinois 13Public Aid Code shall be automatically enrolled in the program 14established by this subsection for the first year of operation 15without the need for further application, except that they 16must apply for Medicare Part D and the Low Income Subsidy under 17Medicare Part D. A person enrolled in the pharmaceutical 18assistance program operated pursuant to subsection (f) of this 19Section as of December 31, 2005, shall not lose eligibility in 20future years due only to the fact that they have not reached 21the age of 65.22    To the extent permitted by federal law, the Department may 23act as an authorized representative of a beneficiary in order 24to enroll the beneficiary in a Medicare Part D Prescription 25Drug Plan if the beneficiary has failed to choose a plan and, 26where possible, to enroll beneficiaries in the low-income   HB5202- 9 -LRB104 18288 KTG 31728 b1subsidy program under Medicare Part D or assist them in 2enrolling in that program.3    Beneficiaries under the program established under this 4subsection shall be divided into the following 4 eligibility 5groups:6        (A) Eligibility Group 1 shall consist of beneficiaries 7    who are not eligible for Medicare Part D coverage and who 8    are:9            (i) a person with a disability and under age 65; or10            (ii) age 65 or older, with incomes over 200% of the 11        Federal Poverty Level; or12            (iii) age 65 or older, with incomes at or below 13        200% of the Federal Poverty Level and not eligible for 14        federally funded means-tested benefits due to 15        immigration status.16        (B) Eligibility Group 2 shall consist of beneficiaries 17    who are eligible for Medicare Part D coverage.18        (C) Eligibility Group 3 shall consist of beneficiaries 19    age 65 or older, with incomes at or below 200% of the 20    Federal Poverty Level, who are not barred from receiving 21    federally funded means-tested benefits due to immigration 22    status and are not eligible for Medicare Part D coverage.23        If the State applies and receives federal approval for 24    a waiver under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 25    persons in Eligibility Group 3 shall continue to receive 26    benefits through the approved waiver, and Eligibility   HB5202- 10 -LRB104 18288 KTG 31728 b1    Group 3 may be expanded to include persons with 2    disabilities who are under age 65 with incomes under 200% 3    of the Federal Poverty Level who are not eligible for 4    Medicare and who are not barred from receiving federally 5    funded means-tested benefits due to immigration status.6        (D) Eligibility Group 4 shall consist of beneficiaries 7    who are otherwise described in Eligibility Group 2 who 8    have a diagnosis of HIV or AIDS. 9    The program established under this subsection shall cover 10the cost of covered prescription drugs in excess of the 11beneficiary cost-sharing amounts set forth in this paragraph 12that are not covered by Medicare. The Department of Healthcare 13and Family Services may establish by emergency rule changes in 14cost-sharing necessary to conform the cost of the program to 15the amounts appropriated for State fiscal year 2012 and future 16fiscal years except that the 24-month limitation on the 17adoption of emergency rules and the provisions of Sections 185-115 and 5-125 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act 19shall not apply to rules adopted under this subsection (g). 20The adoption of emergency rules authorized by this subsection 21(g) shall be deemed to be necessary for the public interest, 22safety, and welfare. 23    For purposes of the program established under this 24subsection, the term "covered prescription drug" has the 25following meanings:26        For Eligibility Group 1, "covered prescription drug"   HB5202- 11 -LRB104 18288 KTG 31728 b1    means: (1) any cardiovascular agent or drug; (2) any 2    insulin or other prescription drug used in the treatment 3    of diabetes, including syringe and needles used to 4    administer the insulin; (3) any prescription drug used in 5    the treatment of arthritis; (4) any prescription drug used 6    in the treatment of cancer; (5) any prescription drug used 7    in the treatment of Alzheimer's disease; (6) any 8    prescription drug used in the treatment of Parkinson's 9    disease; (7) any prescription drug used in the treatment 10    of glaucoma; (8) any prescription drug used in the 11    treatment of lung disease and smoking-related illnesses; 12    (9) any prescription drug used in the treatment of 13    osteoporosis; and (10) any prescription drug used in the 14    treatment of multiple sclerosis. The Department may add 15    additional therapeutic classes by rule. The Department may 16    adopt a preferred drug list within any of the classes of 17    drugs described in items (1) through (10) of this 18    paragraph. The specific drugs or therapeutic classes of 19    covered prescription drugs shall be indicated by rule.20        For Eligibility Group 2, "covered prescription drug" 21    means those drugs covered by the Medicare Part D 22    Prescription Drug Plan in which the beneficiary is 23    enrolled.24        For Eligibility Group 3, "covered prescription drug" 25    means those drugs covered by the Medical Assistance 26    Program under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code.  HB5202- 12 -LRB104 18288 KTG 31728 b1        For Eligibility Group 4, "covered prescription drug" 2    means those drugs covered by the Medicare Part D 3    Prescription Drug Plan in which the beneficiary is 4    enrolled.5    Any person otherwise eligible for pharmaceutical 6assistance under this subsection whose covered drugs are 7covered by any public program is ineligible for assistance 8under this subsection to the extent that the cost of those 9drugs is covered by the other program.10    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 11establish by rule the methods by which it will provide for the 12coverage called for in this subsection. Those methods may 13include direct reimbursement to pharmacies or the payment of a 14capitated amount to Medicare Part D Prescription Drug Plans.15    For a pharmacy to be reimbursed under the program 16established under this subsection, it must comply with rules 17adopted by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 18regarding coordination of benefits with Medicare Part D 19Prescription Drug Plans. A pharmacy may not charge a 20Medicare-enrolled beneficiary of the program established under 21this subsection more for a covered prescription drug than the 22appropriate Medicare cost-sharing less any payment from or on 23behalf of the Department of Healthcare and Family Services.24    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services or the 25Department on Aging, as appropriate, may adopt rules regarding 26applications, counting of income, proof of Medicare status,   HB5202- 13 -LRB104 18288 KTG 31728 b1mandatory generic policies, and pharmacy reimbursement rates 2and any other rules necessary for the cost-efficient operation 3of the program established under this subsection.4    (h) A qualified individual is not entitled to duplicate 5benefits in a coverage period as a result of the changes made 6by this amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly. 7(Source: P.A. 101-10, eff. 6-5-19.)